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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI31D-03

DTC PO 110/24ntake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
(fig.1)
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The intake air temp. sensor is mounted on the air cleaner cap
and sensors the intake air temperature.

A thermistor built in the sensor changes the resistance value
according to the intake air temp. The lower the intake air temp.
the greater the thermistor resistance value, and the higher the
intake air temp. the lower the thermistor resistance value
(See fig.1).

Theairintaketemp. sensoris connected to the engine ECU

(See below). The 5V power source voltage in the ECU is ap-
plied to the intake air temp. sensor from the terminal THA via
a resistor R.

That is the resistor R and the intake air temp. sensor are con-
nected in series. When the resistance value of the intake air
temperature sensor changes in accordance with changes in the
intake air temp. the potential at terminal THA also changes.
Based on this signal, the engine ECU increases the fuel injec-
tion volume to improve driveability during cold engine opera-
tion.

Ifthe engine ECU detectsthe DTC”P0110/24”, it operates the
fail safe function in which the intake air temperature is assumed
tobe20 °C (68 °F).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Open orshortinintake airtemp. sensor circuitfor 0.5 sec. or

¢ Openorshastimintakeair temwiii ssessor citeuit

P0110/24 more e Intake airtemp. sensas.
*EngineECU

HINT:
Afterconfirming DTC P0O110/24usethehand  —heldtesterto confirmtheintake airtemperature from”CUR-
RENT DATA”.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

-40°C (- 40°F) Open circuit
140° C (284 °F) ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air —fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthetime
of the malfunction.

. IfDTC”P0105/31” (Vacuum Sensor Circuit Malfunction), ’P0110/24” (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunc-
tion), ’P0115/22” (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction), ’P0120/41” (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Mal-
function) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.
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When using hand-held tester

1 Connect the hand-held tester, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:

Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature

HINT:

« If there is open circuit, hand-held tester indicates — 40° C (- 40°F).

. If there is short circuit, hand- held tester indicates 140° C (284°F) or more.

140° C (284°F) or more .... Go to step 4.

NG> -40°C (-40°F) .... Go to step 2.

@

Check for intermittent problem
(See gage DI-4).

2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

ON PREPARATION:
@ (@) Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.

(b) Connectthe sensorwire harnessterminalstogether.
(c) Turntheignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Readtemperaturevalueonthehand -heldtester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140°C (284 °F)ormore

Intake Air Temp. Engine ECU
Sensor

BE6653
A00347

A00348
OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place intake air temp. sensor.

e ]

1FZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)



DI-31

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

3 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

-

Sensor

Intake Air Temp. Engine ECU

E6653
17057
23723

A00392

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU.
HINT:
Intake air temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the
engine ECU connector (See page IN-19).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284° F) or more

OK Open in harness between terminals E2 or THA
repair or replace harness.

B

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.
If OK, replace engine ECU.

4 | Check for short in harness and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

ON

Sensor

Intake Air Temp.

Engine ECU

2
O

BE6653
A00362

A00363

B
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PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Readtemperaturevalueonthehand -heldtester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: -40°C (- 40°F)

OKé blace intake air temp. sensor.
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5 [ Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

ON
%,

Intake Air Temp. Sensor
/
00000000000 000000000
0000000000000 00000000000

Y

BE6653 E12 Connector

FI7056
A02261 A02607

~

Engine ECU

]

| pe—
—— L

PREPARATION:

NG

(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
HINT:
Intake air temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(c)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: —40°C (- 40°F)

OK> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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When not using hand-held tester

1 | Check voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU connecter

ON PREPARATION:
@ (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
{TIEIEIEIEIEIEIEIDEIDEI OO0 IO 7CHECK:
SO0 O g OO Measure voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine
N{( ECU connector.
OK:
T(T')A‘ Intake Air Temperature Voltage
A02520 20°C (68°F) 05-34V
60°C (140°F) 02-10V

OK Check for intermittent problem
(See page DI-4).

NG

2 [ Check intake air temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.
CHECK:
C()) Measure resistance between terminals.
OK:
Resistance is within Acceptable Zone on chart.
Intake Air Temperature Resistance
20°C (68°F) 2-3kQ
Ao1361 80°C (176°F) 0.2 -0.4kQ

NG> Replace intake air temp. sensor.
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3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
intake air temp. sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU.
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